Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.170

Coroner not to practice law.

The coroner shall not appear or practice as attorney in any court, except in defense of himself or herself or his or her deputies.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4039; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.170. Prior: 1891 c 45 s 4, part; Code 1881 s 2770, part; 1863 p 558 s 5, part; 1854 p 434 s 5, part; RRS s 4171, part.]